Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3035.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. North Providence low- or moderate-income housing parking spaces.
The town of North Providence may require two (2) parking spaces for each studio, one-
bedroom, or two (2) bedroom low- or moderate-income housing unit upon the municipality's
determination that there is limited or no local public transportation or off-street parking availability
within a reasonable proximity to these low- or moderate-income housing units.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005938
========